Rhode Island statutes. Title 18 Fiduciaries
Chapter 16 Rhode Island Short Form Power of Attorney Act
18-16-9.
Claims and litigation.

In a statutory short form power of attorney, the language conferring general authority with respect to claims and litigation shall be construed to mean that the principal authorizes the agent:

To assert and prosecute before any court, administrative board, department, commissioner or other tribunal any cause of action, claim, counterclaim, offset, or defense, which the principal has, or claims to have, against any individual, partnership, association, corporation, government, or other person or instrumentality, including, but not limited to, power to sue for the recovery of land or of any other thing of value, for the recovery of damages sustained by the principal in any manner, for the elimination or modification of tax liability, for injunction, for specific performance, or for any other relief;

To bring an action of interpleader or other action to determine adverse claims; to intervene or interplead in any action or proceeding, and to act in any litigation as amicus curiae;

In connection with any action or proceeding or controversy, at law or otherwise, to apply for and, if possible, procure a libel, an attachment, a garnishment, an order of arrest or other preliminary, provisional or intermediate relief and to resort to and utilize in all ways permitted by law any available procedure for the effectuation or satisfaction of the judgment, order or decree obtained;

In connection with any action or proceeding, at law or otherwise, to perform any act which the principal might perform, including, but not limited to, acceptance of tender, offer of judgment, admission of any facts, submission of any controversy on an agreed statement of facts, consent to examination before trial, and generally to bind the principal in the conduct of any litigation or controversy as seems desirable to the agent;

To submit to arbitration, settle, and propose or accept a compromise with respect to, any claim existing in favor of or against the principal, or any litigation to which the principal is or may become or be designated a party;

To waive the issuance, and service of a summons, citation or other process upon the principal; to accept service of process; to appear for the principal; to designate persons upon whom process directed to the principal may be served; to execute and file or deliver stipulations on the principal’s behalf; to verify pleadings; to appeal to appellate tribunals, to procure and give surety and indemnity bonds at the times and to the extent that the agent deems desirable or necessary; to contract and pay for the preparations and printing of records and briefs; to receive and execute and file or deliver any consent, waiver, release, confession of judgment, satisfaction of judgment, notice, agreement or other instrument which the agent deems desirable or necessary in connection with the prosecution, settlement or defense of any claim by or against the principal or of any litigation to which the principal is or may become or be designated a party;

To appear for, represent and act for the principal with respect to bankruptcy or insolvency proceedings, whether voluntary or involuntary, whether of the principal or of some other person, with respect to any reorganization proceeding, or with respect to any receivership or application for the appointment of a receiver or trustee which, in any way, affects any interest of the principal in any land, chattel, bond, share, commodity interest, chose in action or other thing of value;

To hire, discharge and compensate any attorney, accountant, expert witness or other assistant or assistants when the agent deems this action to be desirable for the proper execution by him or her of any powers described in this section;

To pay, from funds in his or her control or for the account of the principal, any judgment against the principal or any settlement which may be made in connection with any transaction enumerated in this section, and to receive and conserve any moneys or other things of value paid in settlement of or as proceeds of one or more of the transactions enumerated in this section, and to receive and endorse checks and to deposit them; and

In general, and in addition to all the specific acts enumerated in this section, to do any other act or acts, which the principal can do through an agent, in connection with any claim by or against the principal or with litigation to which the principal is or may become or be designated a party.

All powers described in this section shall be equally exercisable with respect to any claim or litigation existing at the giving of the power of attorney or thereafter arising, whether arising in the state of Rhode Island or elsewhere.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 375, § 1.

18-16-10.
Benefits from military service.

In a statutory short form of power of attorney, the language conferring general authority with respect to benefits from military service shall be construed to mean that the principal authorizes the agent:

To execute vouchers in the name of the principal for any allowances and reimbursements payable by the United States, or by any state or subdivision of it, to the principal, including, but not limited to, all allowances and reimbursements for transportation of the principal and of his or her dependents, and for shipment of household effects; to receive, endorse and collect the proceeds of any check payable to the order of the principal drawn of the treasurer or other fiscal officer or depository of the United States or of any state or subdivision thereof;

To take possession and order the removal and shipment of any property of the principal from any post, warehouse, depot, dock or other place of storage or safekeeping, either governmental or private; to execute and deliver any release, voucher, receipt, bill of lading, shipping ticket, certificate or other instrument which the agent deems to be desirable or necessary for this purpose;

To prepare, file, and prosecute the claim of the principal to any benefit or assistance, financial or otherwise, to which the principal is, or claims to be entitled, under the provisions of any statute or regulation existing at the creation of the agency or thereafter enacted by the United States or by any state or by any subdivision of it, or any foreign government, which benefit or assistance arises from or is based upon military service performed prior to or after the creation of the agency by the principal or by any person related by blood or by marriage to the principal; to execute any receipt or other instrument which the agent deems desirable or necessary for the enforcement or for the collection of the claim;

To receive the financial proceeds of any claim of the type described in this section; to conserve, invest, disburse or utilize any proceeds received for purposes enumerated in this section, and to be reimbursed for any expenditures properly made by him or her in the execution of the powers conferred on him or her by the statutory short form of power of attorney;

To prosecute, defend, submit to arbitration, settle, and propose or accept a compromise with respect to, any claim existing in favor of, or against, the principal based on or involving any benefits from military service, or to intervene in any action or proceeding relating thereto;

To hire, discharge and compensate any attorney, accountant, expert witness, or other assistant or assistants when the agent deems this action to be desirable for the proper execution by him or her of any of the powers described in this section; and

In general, and in addition to all the specific acts enumerated in this section, to do any other act or acts, which the principal can do through an agent, and which the agent deems desirable or necessary, to assure to the principal, and to the dependents of the principal, the maximum possible benefit from the military service performed prior to or after the creation of the agency by the principal or by any person related by blood or marriage to the principal.

All powers described in this section shall be equally exercisable with respect to any benefits from military service existing at the giving of the power of attorney or thereafter accruing, whether accruing in the state of Rhode Island or elsewhere.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 375, § 1.

18-16-11.
Records, reports and statements.

In a statutory short form power of attorney, the language conferring general authority with respect to records, reports and statements shall be construed to mean that the principal authorizes the agent:

To keep records of all cash received and disbursed for or on account of the principal, of all credits and debits to the account of the principal and of all transactions affecting in any way the assets and liabilities of the principal;

To prepare, execute and file all tax, social security, unemployment insurance and information returns, required by the laws of the United States, of any state or of any subdivision of it, or of any foreign government; to prepare, execute and file all other papers and instruments which the agent deems desirable or necessary for the safeguarding of the principal against excess or illegal taxation or against penalties imposed for claimed violation of any law or other governmental regulation;

To prepare, execute and file any record, report or statement, which the agent deems desirable or necessary for the safeguarding or maintenance of the principal’s interest, with respect to price, rent, wage or rationing control, or other governmental activity;

To hire, discharge and compensate any attorney, accountant, or other assistant or assistants when the agent deems this action to be desirable for the proper execution by him or her of any of the powers described in this section; and

In general, and in addition to all the specific acts enumerated in this section, to do any other act or acts, which the principal can do through an agent, in connection with the preparation, execution, filing, storage or other utilization of any records, reports or statements of or concerning the principal’s affairs.

All powers described in this section shall be equally exercisable with respect to any records, reports or statements of or concerning the affairs of the principal existing at the giving of the power of attorney or thereafter arising, whether arising in the state of Rhode Island or elsewhere.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 375, § 1.

18-16-12.
Additional provisions authorized in form.

A power of attorney which satisfies the requirements of §

18-16-2(b)

is not prevented from being a statutory short form power of attorney, as that phrase is used in the sections of this chapter, by the fact that it also contains additional language which:

Eliminates from the power of attorney one or more of the powers enumerated in one or more of the constructional sections of this chapter with respect to a subdivision of the statutory short form power of attorney not eliminated from the form by the principal;

Supplements one or more of the powers enumerated in one or more of the constructional sections in this chapter with respect to a subdivision of the statutory short form power of attorney not eliminated from the form by the principal, by specifically listing additional powers of the agent; or

Makes some additional provision that is not inconsistent with the other provisions of the statutory short form power of attorney.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 375, § 1.